src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/A-armas_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Adjective - armas: # adjectives 'dear / armas' - full paradigm
     armas+A+Sg+Nom: armas
     armas+A+Sg+Gen: armahan
     armas+A+Sg+Acc: [armas, armahan]
     armas+A+Sg+Par: armastu
     armas+A+Sg+Tra: armahakse
     armas+A+Sg+Abe: [armahattah, armahata]
     armas+A+Sg+Com: armahanke
     armas+A+Sg+Ine: armahas
     armas+A+Sg+Ela: [armahaspäi, armahas]
     armas+A+Sg+Ill: armahah
     armas+A+Sg+Ade: armahal
     armas+A+Sg+Abl: [armahalpäi, armahal]
     armas+A+Sg+All: armahale
     armas+A+Sg+Ess: armahannu
     armas+A+Sg+Ter: armahassah
     armas+A+Sg+Apr: armahalluo
     armas+A+Pl+Nom: armahat
     armas+A+Pl+Gen: armahien
     armas+A+Pl+Acc: armahat
     armas+A+Pl+Par: armahii
     armas+A+Pl+Tra: armahikse
     armas+A+Pl+Abe: [armahittah, armahita]
     armas+A+Pl+Com: armahienke
     armas+A+Pl+Ine: armahis
     armas+A+Pl+Ela: [armahispäi, armahis]
     armas+A+Pl+Ill: armahih
     armas+A+Pl+Ade: armahil
     armas+A+Pl+Abl: [armahilpäi, armahil]
     armas+A+Pl+All: armahile
     armas+A+Pl+Ess: armahinnu
     armas+A+Pl+Ins: armahin
     armas+A+Pl+Apr: armahielluo
     armas+A+Sg+Nom+Clt/gi: armasgi
     armas+A+Sg+Gen+Clt/gi: armahangi
     armas+A+Sg+Acc+Clt/gi: [armasgi, armahangi]
     armas+A+Sg+Par+Clt/gi: armastugi
     armas+A+Sg+Tra+Clt/gi: armahaksegi
     armas+A+Sg+Abe+Clt/gi: [armahatagi, armahattahgi]
     armas+A+Sg+Com+Clt/gi: armahankegi
     armas+A+Sg+Ine+Clt/gi: armahasgi
     armas+A+Sg+Ela+Clt/gi: [armahaspäigi, armahasgi]
     armas+A+Sg+Ill+Clt/gi: armahahgi
     armas+A+Sg+Ade+Clt/gi: armahalgi
     armas+A+Sg+Abl+Clt/gi: [armahalpäigi, armahalgi]
     armas+A+Sg+All+Clt/gi: armahalegi
     armas+A+Sg+Ess+Clt/gi: armahannugi
     armas+A+Sg+Ter+Clt/gi: armahassahgi
     armas+A+Sg+Apr+Clt/gi: armahalluogi
     armas+A+Pl+Nom+Clt/gi: armahatgi
     armas+A+Pl+Gen+Clt/gi: armahiengi
     armas+A+Pl+Acc+Clt/gi: armahatgi
     armas+A+Pl+Par+Clt/gi: armahiigi
     armas+A+Pl+Tra+Clt/gi: armahiksegi
     armas+A+Pl+Abe+Clt/gi: [armahitagi, armahittahgi]
     armas+A+Pl+Com+Clt/gi: armahienkegi
     armas+A+Pl+Ine+Clt/gi: armahisgi
     armas+A+Pl+Ela+Clt/gi: [armahispäigi, armahisgi]
     armas+A+Pl+Ill+Clt/gi: armahihgi
     armas+A+Pl+Ade+Clt/gi: armahilgi
     armas+A+Pl+Abl+Clt/gi: [armahilpäigi, armahilgi]
     armas+A+Pl+All+Clt/gi: armahilegi
     armas+A+Pl+Ess+Clt/gi: armahinnugi
     armas+A+Pl+Ins+Clt/gi: armahingi
     armas+A+Pl+Apr+Clt/gi: armahielluogi
